Washington statutes.
RCW 35.63.020

Commissioners—Manner of appointment.

If any council or board desires to avail itself of the powers conferred by this chapter it shall create a city or county planning commission consisting of from three to twelve members to be appointed by the mayor or chair of the municipality and confirmed by the council or board: PROVIDED, That in cities of the first class having a commission form of government consisting of three or more members, the commissioner of public works shall appoint the planning commission, which appointment shall be confirmed by a majority of the city commissioners. Cities of the first class operating under self-government charters may extend the membership and the duties and powers of its commission beyond those prescribed in this chapter.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2113; 1965 c 7 s 35.63.020. Prior: (i) 1935 c 44 s 2, part; RRS s 9322-2, part. (ii) 1935 c 44 s 12; RRS s 9322-12.]